debug.lexc
[N][Equ][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:–mtun            EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:–mtun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Sg possessor |
[N][Equ][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:–mtestun         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:–mtestun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtestun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Pl possessor |
[N][Equ][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:–mtegestun       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:–mtegestun   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtegestun EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Equ][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:–gpetun          EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:–gpetun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpetun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Sg possessor |
[N][Equ][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:–gpesistun       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:–gpesistun   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpesistun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
[N][Equ][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:–gpetegetun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:–gpetegetun  EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpetegetun  EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Equ][4SgPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmitun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][4SgPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmitun    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][4SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmitun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Sg possessor |
[N][Equ][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegestun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][4PlPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegestun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][4PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegestun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Pl possessor |
[N][Equ][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegestun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegestun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegestun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|


! -------------------------------------------------|
!              Relative Case Endings               | 
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!               singular possessed                 |                    plural possessed                |               dual possessed                |    
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Rel][Unpd][Sg]:~sf-w%:(e)m        EncliticOrEnd;[N][Rel][Unpd][Pl]:~sf-w%:(e)t         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)k              EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Rel][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)an  EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)an  EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gkenka  EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Sg possessor |
[N][Rel][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)ita EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)ita EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)gkenka    EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Pl possessor |
[N][Rel][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)ita EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)ita EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)gkenka    EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Rel][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wma      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wma      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gma     EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Sg possessor |
[N][Rel][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:–mta        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:–mta        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemta   EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Pl possessor |
[N][Rel][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:–mtung      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:–mtung      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtung EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Rel][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:–gpek       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:–gpek       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpek    EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Sg possessor |
[N][Rel][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:–gpesi      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:–gpesi      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpesi   EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
[N][Rel][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:–gpetek     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:–gpetek     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpetek  EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Rel][4SgPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmi      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][4SgPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmi      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][4SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmi     EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Sg possessor |
[N][Rel][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmeng    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][4PlPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmeng    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][4PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmeng   EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Pl possessor |
[N][Rel][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmeng    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmeng    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Rel][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmeng   EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|



LEXICON EncliticOrEnd
0:0               #;
-lli[Encl]:lli    #;
-llu[Encl]:llu    #;
-mi[Encl]:mi      #;
-ngam[Encl]:ngma  #;
-nguq[Encl]:nguq  #;
-qa[Encl]:qa      #;
-qun[Encl]:qun    #;
-sa[Encl]:sa      #;
-ta[Encl]:ta      #;
-tuq[Encl]:tuq    #;
-wha[Encl]:wha    #;

!-ete[to.be]:(i/e)te*  VerbIntr7; ! FIX ME
!-ete[to.be]:(i/e)te*  VerbTrns7; ! FIX ME



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                        !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Verb Bases               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                        !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Particle
elngaatall            	EncliticOrEnd; ! very; very much
